District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-3601

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 620, Pub. L. 88-503, § 2
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(a)(1), 44 DCR 1730
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2601.
1973 Ed., § 2-2401.